Nevada, session 83, AB456.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 704 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if
notice is required to be provided by a public utility to a customer
pursuant to this chapter or the regulations adopted pursuant
thereto, the notice must be made available in English and the
three languages other than English which are most commonly
spoken in this State, as determined by the Commission. If a
customer has designated the language in which he or she prefers
to receive communications from the public utility, the public utility
is not required to provide notice to that customer in a language
other than the preferred language designated by the customer.
2. The Commission shall adopt regulations as necessary to
ensure, to the maximum extent practicable, that customers of a
public utility who are persons with limited English proficiency or
persons with a communication disability are able to communicate
and receive communications in a comprehensible form from the
public utilities in this State.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Person with a communication disability” means a person
who, because the person is deaf or hard of hearing or has a
-
*AB456*

– 3 –
physical speaking impairment, cannot readily understand or
communicate in the English language.
(b) “Person with limited English proficiency” means a person
who speaks a language other than English and who cannot readily
understand or communicate in the English language.
Sec. 3. 1. A public utility may not provide any information
concerning a customer of the public utility to any person for
commercial purposes without the approval of the Commission.
Nothing in this section shall be deemed to preclude a public utility
from providing any person, including any other utility or
telecommunication provider, with information necessary to
provide utility services.
2. Except for disclosures made pursuant to NRS 704.197,
704.202 or 704.206, or a disclosure to which a customer consents
in writing, before disclosing any information concerning a
customer of a public utility to a third party, a public utility shall
take reasonable steps to ensure that such information will not be
subject to further disclosure.
Sec. 4. NRS 704.1835 is hereby amended to read as follows:
704.1835 1. A public utility shall not terminate utility
service for gas, water or electricity to a residential customer
because of nonpayment:
(a) If the outstanding amount owed by the customer is less
than $300.
(b) If payment for the outstanding amount owed by the
customer is less than 6 months overdue.
(c) If at least half of the outstanding amount owed by the
customer was paid within the immediately preceding 25 days.
(d) On a day, or on a day immediately preceding a day, on
which the office of the utility which accepts or processes payments
for utility service is closed.
(e) Without first:
(1) Applying the amount of any security deposit of the
customer held by the utility towards the outstanding amount owed
by the customer.
(2) Providing:
(I) A written notice to the customer by mail or by
electronic transmission pursuant to NRS 704.188 at least 10 days
before the date on which the utility service of the customer will be
terminated, which notice must include, without limitation, written
information regarding governmental agencies or other
organizations which have notified the public utility that they will
assist customers in paying their utility bills; and
(II) A second written notice by a method which ensures
that the notice is delivered to the customer or the customer’s
-
*AB456*

– 4 –
premises at least 48 hours before the utility terminates service,
which notice must include, without limitation, written information
regarding governmental agencies or other organizations which
have notified the public utility that they will assist customers in
paying their utility bills.
(3) Providing notice to the customer through a telephone
call made to the telephone number for the customer that is on file
with the utility at least 5 days before the date on which the utility
service will be terminated.
(4) Providing a duplicate of any written notice or
information required pursuant to this paragraph to the person, if
any, designated by the customer pursuant to subsection 7.
2. A public utility shall not terminate the electricity service of
any residential customer for nonpayment at any time from May 1
through October 31, inclusive, of each year.
3. A public utility shall not terminate the gas service of any
residential customer on a day for which the National Weather
Service has issued, for the location of the premises where the gas
service is provided:
(a) A forecast predicting that the outside temperature that day
will not exceed 32 degrees; or
(b) A winter weather advisory, winter storm watch, winter
storm warning or any other advisory of the potential for
significant and hazardous cold weather.
4. For the purposes of protecting the health of residential
customers who receive gas, water or electricity from public utilities,
in addition to and consistent with the provisions of this section, the
Commission shall adopt or amend regulations that:
(a) Establish the criteria that will be used to determine when a
public utility is required to postpone its termination of utility service
to the residence of a residential customer who has failed to pay for
such service. Such criteria may be based in part upon the residential
customer’s ability to pay.
(b) Require a public utility to postpone its termination of utility
service to the residence of a residential customer who has failed to
pay for such service if the residential customer satisfies the criteria
established by the Commission and termination of the utility service
is reasonably likely to threaten the health of an occupant of the
residence of the residential customer.
[2.] 5. In addition to the regulations adopted pursuant to
subsection [1,] 4, for the purposes of regulating public utilities that
provide gas, water or electricity to landlords who pay for the utility
service and who distribute or resell the gas, water or electricity to
one or more residential tenants, the Commission shall adopt or
amend regulations to require a public utility to use its best efforts to
-
*AB456*

– 5 –
post, in a conspicuous location, notice of the intent of the public
utility to terminate utility service because the landlord has failed to
pay for such service. Such notice must provide sufficient
information to allow residential tenants or their occupants to contact
the public utility if termination of the utility service is reasonably
likely to threaten the health of an occupant of the residence of a
residential tenant.
[3.] 6. A public utility shall not terminate utility service for
gas, water or electricity without complying with the provisions of
this section and the regulations adopted by the Commission
pursuant to this section.
[4.] 7. A public utility who provides utility service for gas,
water or electricity shall give written notice to each customer who
is elderly or who is a person with a disability that the customer
may designate a third person to receive notice of the pending
termination of utility service of the customer. The utility shall give
the written notice:
(a) At the time the customer applies for service; or
(b) If the customer applies for service by telephone, at the time
the customer receives the first bill for service.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Gas” includes, without limitation, liquefied petroleum gas
and natural gas.
(b) “Landlord” means a landlord who is subject, in whole or in
part, to the provisions of chapter 118A or 118B of NRS.
(c) “National Weather Service” means the National Weather
Service of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration
of the United States Department of Commerce.
(d) “Third person” includes any guarantor of the customer
making the designation and any other person or public agency
other than the customer or the utility.
Sec. 5. The Public Utilities Commission of Nevada shall, as
soon as practicable, amend or repeal any existing regulations that
conflict or are otherwise inconsistent with the provisions of this act.
Sec. 6. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB456*